Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB765.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 95A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the volunteer fire department emergency medical
expenses fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from grants, gifts,
state appropriations, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Fire Commission.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be disbursed exclusively for the
purposes set out in subsection (2) of this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of the
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
year.
(2) A volunteer fire department established under KRS Chapter 273 may apply to the
Kentucky Fire Commission for funds from the volunteer fire department
emergency medical expense fund. The funds shall exclusively be used for:
(a) Purchasing emergency medical supplies, devices, or equipment; and
(b) Reimbursement of the costs:
1. Associated with replacing used emergency medical supplies, devices,
or equipment; and
2. Of any training, licensure, or certification of members of the volunteer
fire department related to the provision of emergency medical services.
(3) The commission shall endeavor to distribute the available funds in an equitable
manner.
(4) The Kentucky Fire Commission may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 9:17 AM Jacketed